Utah statutes.
78B-13-318.   Transitional provision.

A motion or other request for relief made in a child custody or enforcement proceeding which was commenced before the effective date of this chapter is governed by the law in effect at the time the motion or other request was made.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

